Illinois, session 104th, SB2983.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Administrative Procedure Act is 5amended by adding Section 5-45.71 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 100/5-45.71 new)7    Sec. 5-45.71. Emergency rulemaking. To provide for the 8expeditious and timely implementation of the changes made to 9the Election Code and the Unified Code of Corrections by this 10amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, emergency rules 11implementing the those changes may be adopted in accordance 12with Section 5-45 by the State Board of Elections or the 13Department of Corrections, except that the 24-month limitation 14on the adoption of emergency rules and the provisions of 15Sections 5-115 and 5-125 do not apply to rules adopted under 16this Section. The adoption of emergency rules authorized by 17Section 5-45 and this Section is deemed to be necessary for the 18public interest, safety, and welfare. 19    This Section is repealed one year after the effective date 20of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 21    Section 10. The Election Code is amended by changing 22Sections 3-5, 19-2.3, and 19-2.5 and by adding Sections 1-26,   SB2983- 2 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b11-27, 1-28, and 1-29 as follows: 2    (10 ILCS 5/1-26 new)3    Sec. 1-26. Post-conviction voting.4    (a) As used in this Section, "correctional institution" 5means any place used to house persons under State supervision, 6including, but not limited to, State, out of state, federal, 7or juvenile facilities, adult transition centers, halfway 8houses, and other reentry or rehabilitation programs.9    (b) Beginning on January 1, 2028, a person convicted of a 10felony, or otherwise sentenced to a correctional institution, 11shall have his or her right to vote restored and shall be 12eligible to vote not later than 14 days following his or her 13conviction. A person who is serving a sentence in a 14correctional institution starting prior to January 1, 2028 15shall have his or her right to vote restored not later than 16January 14, 2028. Persons under any form of State supervision 17or custody who are disqualified from voting shall have their 18right to vote restored under this Section, including, but not 19limited to: persons incarcerated or detained in State, 20federal, or juvenile facilities; persons on probation or 21parole; persons on mandatory supervised release; persons on 22work release; persons on furlough; persons released on 23electronic monitoring; persons housed in adult transition 24centers, halfway houses, or other reentry or rehabilitation 25programs; and persons owing court fines or fees. A person may   SB2983- 3 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1not be denied the right to vote because of an adjudicated 2delinquent status or a past criminal conviction.3    (c) Each Illinois local election authority shall 4collaborate with the correctional institution, Department of 5Corrections, and other correctional agencies incarcerating 6eligible voters to facilitate voting by mail for those voters 7eligible to vote in that election jurisdiction who are 8incarcerated in the correctional institution.9    (d) All requirements of the federal Voting Rights Act of 101965, including Sections 203 and 208, State and local language 11access requirements, and the federal Americans with 12Disabilities Act and State and local disability access 13requirements shall also apply to voting under this Section. 14Each Illinois local election authority shall collaborate with 15the correctional institution to facilitate voter registration 16for voters eligible to vote. Correctional institutions shall 17coordinate with local election authorities to make available 18to persons in their custody voter registration applications, 19vote by mail ballots received from a local election authority, 20and other election materials in the languages provided by the 21State Board of Elections and local election authorities. 22    (e) The correctional institution shall make available to a 23person in its custody current election resource material, 24maintained by the State Board of Elections, containing 25detailed information regarding the voting rights of a person 26with a criminal conviction in the following formats: (1) in   SB2983- 4 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1print; (2) on the correctional institution's website; and (3) 2in a visible location on the premises of each correctional 3institution where notices are customarily posted. Local 4election authorities shall collaborate with the correctional 5institution to also make available to a person in its custody 6current election resource material from a local election 7authority that is requested by that person in its custody. The 8correctional institution shall provide resource materials to a 9person in its custody upon intake and release of the person on 10parole, mandatory supervised release, final discharge, or 11pardon from the correctional institution. 12    (f) On or before December 31, 2028, and on or before 13December 31 of each year thereafter, the State Board of 14Elections, in coordination and cooperation with correctional 15institutions and local election authorities, shall prepare a 16report and submit the report to the General Assembly 17containing data concerning compliance with this Section, 18including the number of voter registrations, vote by mail 19ballot applications, vote by mail ballots received, and 20election resource materials delivered. Data shall be 21disaggregated by institution and other factors.22    (g) A person who has left the person's last known place of 23residence as part of the person's confinement in a 24correctional institution and who has not established another 25residence for voter registration purposes may not be 26considered to have changed or lost residence. The person may   SB2983- 5 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1register to vote at the address of the person's last place of 2residence before the person's confinement in a correctional 3institution while the person is confined in a correctional 4institution. 5    (h) The provisions of this Section apply to all elections 6beginning in 2028. 7    (i) The State Board of Elections or the Department of 8Corrections may adopt rules, including emergency rules, to 9implement the provisions of this Section.  10    (10 ILCS 5/1-27 new)11    Sec. 1-27. Civil actions. 12    (a) The Attorney General may bring a civil action in a 13court of competent jurisdiction for such declaratory or 14injunctive relief as is necessary for a violation of Section 151-26.16    (b) Any individual aggrieved by a violation of Section 171-26, any entity whose membership includes individuals 18aggrieved by a violation of Section 1-26, any entity whose 19mission would be frustrated by a violation of Section 1-26, or 20any entity that would expend resources in order to fulfill its 21mission as a result of a violation of Section 1-26 may provide 22written notice of the violation to the Director of Corrections 23and the chair of the State Board of Elections.24        (1) If the violation is not corrected within 30 days 25    after receipt of a notice under this subsection (b), or   SB2983- 6 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1    within 20 days after receipt of the notice under this 2    subsection (b) if the violation occurred within 120 days 3    before the date of an election, the aggrieved party may 4    bring a civil action in court of competent jurisdiction 5    for declaratory or injunctive relief with respect to the 6    violation.7        (2) If the violation occurred within 30 days before 8    the date of an election, the aggrieved person need not 9    provide notice to Director of Corrections or the chair of 10    the State Board of Elections under this subsection (b) 11    before bringing a civil action under paragraph (1) of this 12    subsection (b).13    (c) This Act is intended to benefit and protect the rights 14of individual voters and to provide a remedy for infringing on 15the rights granted under this Act.16    (d) All requirements of the federal Prison Litigation 17Reform Act, 42 U.S.C. 1997e, including subsection (a), Section 183-8-8 of the Unified Code of Corrections, and 20 Ill. Adm. Code 19Part 504, Subpart F, shall also apply to this Section. 20    (10 ILCS 5/1-28 new)21    Sec. 1-28. Attorney's fees. Upon motion, a court shall 22award reasonable attorney's fees and costs, including expert 23witness fees and other litigation expenses, to a plaintiff 24(other than the State of Illinois) in any action brought under 25Section 1-27:  SB2983- 7 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1        (1) who obtains some or all of the plaintiff's 2    requested relief through a judicial judgment in the 3    plaintiff's favor;4        (2) who obtains some or all of his or her requested 5    relief through any settlement agreement approved by the 6    court; or7        (3) whose pursuit of a nonfrivolous claim was a 8    catalyst for a unilateral change in position by the 9    opposing party relative to the relief sought.10    In awarding reasonable attorney's fees, the court shall 11consider the degree to which the relief obtained relates to 12the relief sought. 13    (10 ILCS 5/1-29 new)14    Sec. 1-29. Post-Conviction Task Force. 15    (a) The Post-Conviction Task Force is created to 16strengthen and improve implementation of the provisions of 17Section 1-26 that restore the right to vote for a person 18convicted of a felony, or otherwise under sentence in a 19correctional institution or jail and provides access to vote 20while under sentence in a correctional institution.21    (b) The members of the Task Force shall be as follows:22        (1) the chair of the State Board of Elections, or his 23    or her designee, who shall serve as chair of the Task 24    Force;25        (2) the Director of Corrections, the Department of   SB2983- 8 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1    Corrections Family Liaison, or the designee of the 2    Director of Corrections;3        (3) a representative from a statewide organization 4    that represents county clerks, appointed by the Governor;5        (4) a representative from a nonpartisan Illinois 6    organization advocating against voter disenfranchisement, 7    appointed by the Governor; and8        (5) a voting and civics education workshop peer 9    educator, as defined in Section 5 of the Reintegration and 10    Civic Empowerment Act, appointed by the Governor.11    (c) The State Board of Elections shall provide 12administrative and other support to the Task Force.13    (d) On or before July 1, 2027, the Task Force shall prepare 14a report that summarizes its work and makes recommendations on 15the implementation of restoring voting rights to a person 16convicted of a felony, or otherwise under sentence in a 17correctional institution or jail, and providing access to vote 18while under sentence in a correctional institution.19    (e) The Task Force is dissolved and this Section is 20repealed on January 1, 2028. 21    (10 ILCS 5/3-5)  (from Ch. 46, par. 3-5)22    Sec. 3-5. Confinement or detention in a jail. No person 23who has been legally convicted, in this or another state or in 24any federal court, of any crime, and is serving a sentence of 25confinement in any penal institution, or who has been   SB2983- 9 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1convicted under any Section of this Code and is serving a 2sentence of confinement in any penal institution, shall vote, 3offer to vote, attempt to vote or be permitted to vote at any 4election until his release from confinement. 5    Confinement for purposes of this Section shall include any 6person convicted and imprisoned but granted a furlough as 7provided by Section 3-11-1 of the Unified Code of Corrections, 8or admitted to a work release program as provided by Section 93-13-2 of the Unified Code of Corrections. Confinement shall 10not include any person convicted and imprisoned but released 11on parole. 12    Confinement or detention in a jail pending acquittal or 13conviction of a crime is not a disqualification for voting. 14(Source: P.A. 100-863, eff. 8-14-18.) 15    (10 ILCS 5/19-2.3)16    Sec. 19-2.3. Vote by mail; jails and correctional 17institutions. 18    (a) Each election authority in a county with a population 19under 3,000,000 shall collaborate with the primary county jail 20where eligible voters are confined or detained who are within 21the jurisdiction of the election authority to facilitate an 22opportunity for voting by mail for voters eligible to vote in 23the election jurisdiction who are confined or detained in the 24county jail.25    (b) Each Illinois local election authority shall   SB2983- 10 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1collaborate with the correctional institution to facilitate 2voter registration for voters eligible to vote. Correctional 3institutions shall coordinate with local election authorities 4to make available to persons in their custody voter 5registration applications, vote by mail ballots received from 6a local election authority, and other election materials in 7the languages provided by the State Board of Elections and 8local election authorities. 9(Source: P.A. 101-442, eff. 1-1-20.) 10    (10 ILCS 5/19-2.5)11    Sec. 19-2.5. Notice for vote by mail ballot. 12     An election authority shall notify all qualified voters, 13except voters who are housed in a correctional institution and 14voters who have applied for permanent vote by mail status 15under subsection (b) of Section 19-3 or voters who submit a 16written request to be excluded from the permanent vote by mail 17status, not more than 90 days nor less than 45 days before a 18general election of the option for permanent vote by mail 19status using the following notice and including the 20application for permanent vote by mail status in subsection 21(b) of Section 19-3:22    "You may apply to permanently be placed on vote by mail 23status using the attached application.". 24(Source: P.A. 102-15, eff. 6-17-21; 102-668, eff. 11-15-21; 25103-467, eff. 8-4-23.)   SB2983- 11 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1    Section 15. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 2changing Sections 3-6-3, 3-14-1, and 5-5-5 and by adding 3Sections 5-5-11 and 5-5-12 as follows: 4    (730 ILCS 5/3-6-3)5    Sec. 3-6-3. Rules and regulations for sentence credit. 6    (a)(1) The Department of Corrections shall prescribe rules 7and regulations for awarding and revoking sentence credit for 8persons committed to the Department of Corrections and the 9Department of Juvenile Justice shall prescribe rules and 10regulations for awarding and revoking sentence credit for 11persons committed to the Department of Juvenile Justice under 12Section 5-8-6 of the Unified Code of Corrections, which shall 13be subject to review by the Prisoner Review Board.14    (1.5) As otherwise provided by law, sentence credit may be 15awarded for the following: 16        (A) successful completion of programming while in 17    custody of the Department of Corrections or the Department 18    of Juvenile Justice or while in custody prior to 19    sentencing; 20        (B) compliance with the rules and regulations of the 21    Department; or 22        (C) service to the institution, service to a 23    community, or service to the State. 24    (2) Except as provided in paragraph (4.7) of this   SB2983- 12 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1subsection (a), the rules and regulations on sentence credit 2shall provide, with respect to offenses listed in clause (i), 3(ii), or (iii) of this paragraph (2) committed on or after June 419, 1998 or with respect to the offense listed in clause (iv) 5of this paragraph (2) committed on or after June 23, 2005 (the 6effective date of Public Act 94-71) or with respect to offense 7listed in clause (vi) committed on or after June 1, 2008 (the 8effective date of Public Act 95-625) or with respect to the 9offense of unlawful possession of a firearm by a repeat felony 10offender committed on or after August 2, 2005 (the effective 11date of Public Act 94-398) or with respect to the offenses 12listed in clause (v) of this paragraph (2) committed on or 13after August 13, 2007 (the effective date of Public Act 1495-134) or with respect to the offense of aggravated domestic 15battery committed on or after July 23, 2010 (the effective 16date of Public Act 96-1224) or with respect to the offense of 17attempt to commit terrorism committed on or after January 1, 182013 (the effective date of Public Act 97-990), the following:19        (i) that a prisoner who is serving a term of 20    imprisonment for first degree murder or for the offense of 21    terrorism shall receive no sentence credit and shall serve 22    the entire sentence imposed by the court;23        (ii) that a prisoner serving a sentence for attempt to 24    commit terrorism, attempt to commit first degree murder, 25    solicitation of murder, solicitation of murder for hire, 26    intentional homicide of an unborn child, predatory   SB2983- 13 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1    criminal sexual assault of a child, aggravated criminal 2    sexual assault, criminal sexual assault, aggravated 3    kidnapping, aggravated battery with a firearm as described 4    in Section 12-4.2 or subdivision (e)(1), (e)(2), (e)(3), 5    or (e)(4) of Section 12-3.05, heinous battery as described 6    in Section 12-4.1 or subdivision (a)(2) of Section 7    12-3.05, unlawful possession of a firearm by a repeat 8    felony offender, aggravated battery of a senior citizen as 9    described in Section 12-4.6 or subdivision (a)(4) of 10    Section 12-3.05, or aggravated battery of a child as 11    described in Section 12-4.3 or subdivision (b)(1) of 12    Section 12-3.05 shall receive no more than 4.5 days of 13    sentence credit for each month of his or her sentence of 14    imprisonment;15        (iii) that a prisoner serving a sentence for home 16    invasion, armed robbery, aggravated vehicular hijacking, 17    aggravated discharge of a firearm, or armed violence with 18    a category I weapon or category II weapon, when the court 19    has made and entered a finding, pursuant to subsection 20    (c-1) of Section 5-4-1 of this Code, that the conduct 21    leading to conviction for the enumerated offense resulted 22    in great bodily harm to a victim, shall receive no more 23    than 4.5 days of sentence credit for each month of his or 24    her sentence of imprisonment;25        (iv) that a prisoner serving a sentence for aggravated 26    discharge of a firearm, whether or not the conduct leading   SB2983- 14 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1    to conviction for the offense resulted in great bodily 2    harm to the victim, shall receive no more than 4.5 days of 3    sentence credit for each month of his or her sentence of 4    imprisonment; 5        (v) that a person serving a sentence for gunrunning, 6    narcotics racketeering, controlled substance trafficking, 7    methamphetamine trafficking, drug-induced homicide, 8    aggravated methamphetamine-related child endangerment, 9    money laundering pursuant to clause (c) (4) or (5) of 10    Section 29B-1 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal 11    Code of 2012, or a Class X felony conviction for delivery 12    of a controlled substance, possession of a controlled 13    substance with intent to manufacture or deliver, 14    calculated criminal drug conspiracy, criminal drug 15    conspiracy, street gang criminal drug conspiracy, 16    participation in methamphetamine manufacturing, 17    aggravated participation in methamphetamine 18    manufacturing, delivery of methamphetamine, possession 19    with intent to deliver methamphetamine, aggravated 20    delivery of methamphetamine, aggravated possession with 21    intent to deliver methamphetamine, methamphetamine 22    conspiracy when the substance containing the controlled 23    substance or methamphetamine is 100 grams or more shall 24    receive no more than 7.5 days sentence credit for each 25    month of his or her sentence of imprisonment; 26        (vi) that a prisoner serving a sentence for a second   SB2983- 15 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1    or subsequent offense of luring a minor shall receive no 2    more than 4.5 days of sentence credit for each month of his 3    or her sentence of imprisonment; and 4        (vii) that a prisoner serving a sentence for 5    aggravated domestic battery shall receive no more than 4.5 6    days of sentence credit for each month of his or her 7    sentence of imprisonment. 8    (2.1) For all offenses, other than those enumerated in 9subdivision (a)(2)(i), (ii), or (iii) committed on or after 10June 19, 1998 or subdivision (a)(2)(iv) committed on or after 11June 23, 2005 (the effective date of Public Act 94-71) or 12subdivision (a)(2)(v) committed on or after August 13, 2007 13(the effective date of Public Act 95-134) or subdivision 14(a)(2)(vi) committed on or after June 1, 2008 (the effective 15date of Public Act 95-625) or subdivision (a)(2)(vii) 16committed on or after July 23, 2010 (the effective date of 17Public Act 96-1224), and other than the offense of aggravated 18driving under the influence of alcohol, other drug or drugs, 19or intoxicating compound or compounds, or any combination 20thereof as defined in subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) of 21subsection (d) of Section 11-501 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, 22and other than the offense of aggravated driving under the 23influence of alcohol, other drug or drugs, or intoxicating 24compound or compounds, or any combination thereof as defined 25in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subsection (d) of 26Section 11-501 of the Illinois Vehicle Code committed on or   SB2983- 16 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1after January 1, 2011 (the effective date of Public Act 296-1230), the rules and regulations shall provide that a 3prisoner who is serving a term of imprisonment shall receive 4one day of sentence credit for each day of his or her sentence 5of imprisonment or recommitment under Section 3-3-9. Each day 6of sentence credit shall reduce by one day the prisoner's 7period of imprisonment or recommitment under Section 3-3-9.8    (2.2) A prisoner serving a term of natural life 9imprisonment shall receive no sentence credit.10    (2.3) Except as provided in paragraph (4.7) of this 11subsection (a), the rules and regulations on sentence credit 12shall provide that a prisoner who is serving a sentence for 13aggravated driving under the influence of alcohol, other drug 14or drugs, or intoxicating compound or compounds, or any 15combination thereof as defined in subparagraph (F) of 16paragraph (1) of subsection (d) of Section 11-501 of the 17Illinois Vehicle Code, shall receive no more than 4.5 days of 18sentence credit for each month of his or her sentence of 19imprisonment.20    (2.4) Except as provided in paragraph (4.7) of this 21subsection (a), the rules and regulations on sentence credit 22shall provide with respect to the offenses of aggravated 23battery with a machine gun or a firearm equipped with any 24device or attachment designed or used for silencing the report 25of a firearm or aggravated discharge of a machine gun or a 26firearm equipped with any device or attachment designed or   SB2983- 17 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1used for silencing the report of a firearm, committed on or 2after July 15, 1999 (the effective date of Public Act 91-121), 3that a prisoner serving a sentence for any of these offenses 4shall receive no more than 4.5 days of sentence credit for each 5month of his or her sentence of imprisonment.6    (2.5) Except as provided in paragraph (4.7) of this 7subsection (a), the rules and regulations on sentence credit 8shall provide that a prisoner who is serving a sentence for 9aggravated arson committed on or after July 27, 2001 (the 10effective date of Public Act 92-176) shall receive no more 11than 4.5 days of sentence credit for each month of his or her 12sentence of imprisonment.13    (2.6) Except as provided in paragraph (4.7) of this 14subsection (a), the rules and regulations on sentence credit 15shall provide that a prisoner who is serving a sentence for 16aggravated driving under the influence of alcohol, other drug 17or drugs, or intoxicating compound or compounds or any 18combination thereof as defined in subparagraph (C) of 19paragraph (1) of subsection (d) of Section 11-501 of the 20Illinois Vehicle Code committed on or after January 1, 2011 21(the effective date of Public Act 96-1230) shall receive no 22more than 4.5 days of sentence credit for each month of his or 23her sentence of imprisonment.24    (3) In addition to the sentence credits earned under 25paragraphs (2.1), (4), (4.1), (4.2), and (4.7) of this 26subsection (a), the rules and regulations shall also provide   SB2983- 18 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1that the Director of Corrections or the Director of Juvenile 2Justice may award up to 180 days of earned sentence credit for 3prisoners serving a sentence of incarceration of less than 5 4years, and up to 365 days of earned sentence credit for 5prisoners serving a sentence of 5 years or longer. The 6Director may grant this credit for good conduct in specific 7instances as either Director deems proper for eligible persons 8in the custody of each Director's respective Department. The 9good conduct may include, but is not limited to, compliance 10with the rules and regulations of the Department, service to 11the Department, service to a community, or service to the 12State.13    Eligible inmates for an award of earned sentence credit 14under this paragraph (3) may be selected to receive the credit 15at either Director's or his or her designee's sole discretion. 16Eligibility for the additional earned sentence credit under 17this paragraph (3) may be based on, but is not limited to, 18participation in programming offered by the Department as 19appropriate for the prisoner based on the results of any 20available risk/needs assessment or other relevant assessments 21or evaluations administered by the Department using a 22validated instrument, the circumstances of the crime, 23demonstrated commitment to rehabilitation by a prisoner with a 24history of conviction for a forcible felony enumerated in 25Section 2-8 of the Criminal Code of 2012, the inmate's 26behavior and improvements in disciplinary history while   SB2983- 19 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1incarcerated, and the inmate's commitment to rehabilitation, 2including participation in programming offered by the 3Department. 4    The Director of Corrections or the Director of Juvenile 5Justice shall not award sentence credit under this paragraph 6(3) to an inmate unless the inmate has served a minimum of 60 7days of the sentence, including time served in a county jail; 8except nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to permit 9either Director to extend an inmate's sentence beyond that 10which was imposed by the court. Prior to awarding credit under 11this paragraph (3), each Director shall make a written 12determination that the inmate:13        (A) is eligible for the earned sentence credit;14        (B) has served a minimum of 60 days, or as close to 60 15    days as the sentence will allow;16        (B-1) has received a risk/needs assessment or other 17    relevant evaluation or assessment administered by the 18    Department using a validated instrument; and19        (C) has met the eligibility criteria established by 20    rule for earned sentence credit.21    The Director of Corrections or the Director of Juvenile 22Justice shall determine the form and content of the written 23determination required in this subsection.24    (3.5) The Department shall provide annual written reports 25to the Governor and the General Assembly on the award of earned 26sentence credit no later than February 1 of each year. The   SB2983- 20 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1Department must publish both reports on its website within 48 2hours of transmitting the reports to the Governor and the 3General Assembly. The reports must include:4        (A) the number of inmates awarded earned sentence 5    credit;6        (B) the average amount of earned sentence credit 7    awarded;8        (C) the holding offenses of inmates awarded earned 9    sentence credit; and10        (D) the number of earned sentence credit revocations. 11    (4)(A) Except as provided in paragraph (4.7) of this 12subsection (a), the rules and regulations shall also provide 13that any prisoner who is engaged full-time in any full-time 14substance abuse programs, correctional industry assignments, 15educational programs (including, without limitation, peer-led 16programs for both the peer educators and program 17participants), work-release programs or activities in 18accordance with Article 13 of Chapter III of this Code, 19behavior modification programs, life skills courses, or 20re-entry planning provided by the Department under this 21paragraph (4) and satisfactorily completes the assigned 22program as determined by the standards of the Department, 23shall receive one day of sentence credit for each day in which 24that prisoner is engaged in the activities described in this 25paragraph. The rules and regulations shall also provide that 26sentence credit may be provided to an inmate who was held in   SB2983- 21 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1pre-trial detention prior to his or her current commitment to 2the Department of Corrections and successfully completed a 3full-time, 60-day or longer substance abuse program, 4educational program, behavior modification program, life 5skills course, or re-entry planning provided by the county 6department of corrections or county jail. Calculation of this 7county program credit shall be done at sentencing as provided 8in Section 5-4.5-100 of this Code and shall be included in the 9sentencing order. The rules and regulations shall also provide 10that sentence credit may be provided to an inmate who is in 11compliance with programming requirements in an adult 12transition center.13    (B) The Department shall award sentence credit under this 14paragraph (4) accumulated prior to January 1, 2020 (the 15effective date of Public Act 101-440) in an amount specified 16in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph (4) to an inmate serving 17a sentence for an offense committed prior to June 19, 1998, if 18the Department determines that the inmate is entitled to this 19sentence credit, based upon:20        (i) documentation provided by the Department that the 21    inmate engaged in any full-time substance abuse programs, 22    correctional industry assignments, educational programs 23    (including, without limitation, peer-led programs for both 24    the peer educators and program participants), behavior 25    modification programs, life skills courses, or re-entry 26    planning provided by the Department under this paragraph   SB2983- 22 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1    (4) and satisfactorily completed the assigned program as 2    determined by the standards of the Department during the 3    inmate's current term of incarceration; or4        (ii) the inmate's own testimony in the form of an 5    affidavit or documentation, or a third party's 6    documentation or testimony in the form of an affidavit 7    that the inmate likely engaged in any full-time substance 8    abuse programs, correctional industry assignments, 9    educational programs (including, without limitation, 10    peer-led programs for both the peer educators and program 11    participants), behavior modification programs, life skills 12    courses, or re-entry planning provided by the Department 13    under paragraph (4) and satisfactorily completed the 14    assigned program as determined by the standards of the 15    Department during the inmate's current term of 16    incarceration.17    (C) If the inmate can provide documentation that he or she 18is entitled to sentence credit under subparagraph (B) in 19excess of 45 days of participation in those programs, the 20inmate shall receive 90 days of sentence credit. If the inmate 21cannot provide documentation of more than 45 days of 22participation in those programs, the inmate shall receive 45 23days of sentence credit. In the event of a disagreement 24between the Department and the inmate as to the amount of 25credit accumulated under subparagraph (B), if the Department 26provides documented proof of a lesser amount of days of   SB2983- 23 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1participation in those programs, that proof shall control. If 2the Department provides no documentary proof, the inmate's 3proof as set forth in clause (ii) of subparagraph (B) shall 4control as to the amount of sentence credit provided.5    (D) If the inmate has been convicted of a sex offense as 6defined in Section 2 of the Sex Offender Registration Act, 7sentencing credits under subparagraph (B) of this paragraph 8(4) shall be awarded by the Department only if the conditions 9set forth in paragraph (4.6) of subsection (a) are satisfied. 10No inmate serving a term of natural life imprisonment shall 11receive sentence credit under subparagraph (B) of this 12paragraph (4).13    (E) The rules and regulations shall provide for the 14recalculation of program credits awarded pursuant to this 15paragraph (4) prior to July 1, 2021 (the effective date of 16Public Act 101-652) at the rate set for such credits on and 17after July 1, 2021. 18    Educational, vocational, substance abuse, behavior 19modification programs, life skills courses, re-entry planning, 20and correctional industry programs under which sentence credit 21may be earned under this paragraph (4) and paragraph (4.1) of 22this subsection (a) shall be evaluated by the Department on 23the basis of documented standards. The Department shall report 24the results of these evaluations to the Governor and the 25General Assembly by September 30th of each year. The reports 26shall include data relating to the recidivism rate among   SB2983- 24 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1program participants (including peer educators).2    Availability of these programs shall be subject to the 3limits of fiscal resources appropriated by the General 4Assembly for these purposes. Eligible inmates who are denied 5immediate admission shall be placed on a waiting list under 6criteria established by the Department. The rules and 7regulations shall provide that a prisoner who has been placed 8on a waiting list but is transferred for non-disciplinary 9reasons before beginning a program shall receive priority 10placement on the waitlist for appropriate programs at the new 11facility. The inability of any inmate to become engaged in any 12such programs by reason of insufficient program resources or 13for any other reason established under the rules and 14regulations of the Department shall not be deemed a cause of 15action under which the Department or any employee or agent of 16the Department shall be liable for damages to the inmate. The 17rules and regulations shall provide that a prisoner who begins 18an educational, vocational, substance abuse, work-release 19programs or activities in accordance with Article 13 of 20Chapter III of this Code, behavior modification program, life 21skills course, re-entry planning, or correctional industry 22programs but is unable to complete the program due to illness, 23disability, transfer, lockdown, or another reason outside of 24the prisoner's control shall receive prorated sentence credits 25for the days in which the prisoner did participate. 26    (4.1) Except as provided in paragraph (4.7) of this   SB2983- 25 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1subsection (a), the rules and regulations shall also provide 2that an additional 90 days of sentence credit shall be awarded 3to any prisoner who passes high school equivalency testing 4while the prisoner is committed to the Department of 5Corrections. The sentence credit awarded under this paragraph 6(4.1) shall be in addition to, and shall not affect, the award 7of sentence credit under any other paragraph of this Section, 8but shall also be pursuant to the guidelines and restrictions 9set forth in paragraph (4) of subsection (a) of this Section. 10The sentence credit provided for in this paragraph shall be 11available only to those prisoners who have not previously 12earned a high school diploma or a State of Illinois High School 13Diploma. If, after an award of the high school equivalency 14testing sentence credit has been made, the Department 15determines that the prisoner was not eligible, then the award 16shall be revoked. The Department may also award 90 days of 17sentence credit to any committed person who passed high school 18equivalency testing while he or she was held in pre-trial 19detention prior to the current commitment to the Department of 20Corrections. Except as provided in paragraph (4.7) of this 21subsection (a), the rules and regulations shall provide that 22an additional 120 days of sentence credit shall be awarded to 23any prisoner who obtains an associate degree while the 24prisoner is committed to the Department of Corrections, 25regardless of the date that the associate degree was obtained, 26including if prior to July 1, 2021 (the effective date of   SB2983- 26 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1Public Act 101-652). The sentence credit awarded under this 2paragraph (4.1) shall be in addition to, and shall not affect, 3the award of sentence credit under any other paragraph of this 4Section, but shall also be under the guidelines and 5restrictions set forth in paragraph (4) of subsection (a) of 6this Section. The sentence credit provided for in this 7paragraph (4.1) shall be available only to those prisoners who 8have not previously earned an associate degree prior to the 9current commitment to the Department of Corrections. If, after 10an award of the associate degree sentence credit has been made 11and the Department determines that the prisoner was not 12eligible, then the award shall be revoked. The Department may 13also award 120 days of sentence credit to any committed person 14who earned an associate degree while he or she was held in 15pre-trial detention prior to the current commitment to the 16Department of Corrections. 17    Except as provided in paragraph (4.7) of this subsection 18(a), the rules and regulations shall provide that an 19additional 180 days of sentence credit shall be awarded to any 20prisoner who obtains a bachelor's degree while the prisoner is 21committed to the Department of Corrections. The sentence 22credit awarded under this paragraph (4.1) shall be in addition 23to, and shall not affect, the award of sentence credit under 24any other paragraph of this Section, but shall also be under 25the guidelines and restrictions set forth in paragraph (4) of 26this subsection (a). The sentence credit provided for in this   SB2983- 27 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1paragraph shall be available only to those prisoners who have 2not earned a bachelor's degree prior to the current commitment 3to the Department of Corrections. If, after an award of the 4bachelor's degree sentence credit has been made, the 5Department determines that the prisoner was not eligible, then 6the award shall be revoked. The Department may also award 180 7days of sentence credit to any committed person who earned a 8bachelor's degree while he or she was held in pre-trial 9detention prior to the current commitment to the Department of 10Corrections.11    Except as provided in paragraph (4.7) of this subsection 12(a), the rules and regulations shall provide that an 13additional 180 days of sentence credit shall be awarded to any 14prisoner who obtains a master's or professional degree while 15the prisoner is committed to the Department of Corrections. 16The sentence credit awarded under this paragraph (4.1) shall 17be in addition to, and shall not affect, the award of sentence 18credit under any other paragraph of this Section, but shall 19also be under the guidelines and restrictions set forth in 20paragraph (4) of this subsection (a). The sentence credit 21provided for in this paragraph shall be available only to 22those prisoners who have not previously earned a master's or 23professional degree prior to the current commitment to the 24Department of Corrections. If, after an award of the master's 25or professional degree sentence credit has been made, the 26Department determines that the prisoner was not eligible, then   SB2983- 28 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1the award shall be revoked. The Department may also award 180 2days of sentence credit to any committed person who earned a 3master's or professional degree while he or she was held in 4pre-trial detention prior to the current commitment to the 5Department of Corrections.6    (4.2)(A) The rules and regulations shall also provide that 7any prisoner engaged in self-improvement programs, volunteer 8work, or work assignments that are not otherwise eligible 9activities under paragraph (4), shall receive up to 0.5 days 10of sentence credit for each day in which the prisoner is 11engaged in activities described in this paragraph. 12    (B) The rules and regulations shall provide for the award 13of sentence credit under this paragraph (4.2) for qualifying 14days of engagement in eligible activities occurring prior to 15July 1, 2021 (the effective date of Public Act 101-652). 16    (4.5) The rules and regulations on sentence credit shall 17also provide that when the court's sentencing order recommends 18a prisoner for substance abuse treatment and the crime was 19committed on or after September 1, 2003 (the effective date of 20Public Act 93-354), the prisoner shall receive no sentence 21credit awarded under clause (3) of this subsection (a) unless 22he or she participates in and completes a substance abuse 23treatment program. The Director of Corrections may waive the 24requirement to participate in or complete a substance abuse 25treatment program in specific instances if the prisoner is not 26a good candidate for a substance abuse treatment program for   SB2983- 29 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1medical, programming, or operational reasons. Availability of 2substance abuse treatment shall be subject to the limits of 3fiscal resources appropriated by the General Assembly for 4these purposes. If treatment is not available and the 5requirement to participate and complete the treatment has not 6been waived by the Director, the prisoner shall be placed on a 7waiting list under criteria established by the Department. The 8Director may allow a prisoner placed on a waiting list to 9participate in and complete a substance abuse education class 10or attend substance abuse self-help meetings in lieu of a 11substance abuse treatment program. A prisoner on a waiting 12list who is not placed in a substance abuse program prior to 13release may be eligible for a waiver and receive sentence 14credit under clause (3) of this subsection (a) at the 15discretion of the Director.16    (4.6) The rules and regulations on sentence credit shall 17also provide that a prisoner who has been convicted of a sex 18offense as defined in Section 2 of the Sex Offender 19Registration Act shall receive no sentence credit unless he or 20she either has successfully completed or is participating in 21sex offender treatment as defined by the Sex Offender 22Management Board. However, prisoners who are waiting to 23receive treatment, but who are unable to do so due solely to 24the lack of resources on the part of the Department, may, at 25either Director's sole discretion, be awarded sentence credit 26at a rate as the Director shall determine.  SB2983- 30 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1    (4.7) On or after January 1, 2018 (the effective date of 2Public Act 100-3), sentence credit under paragraph (3), (4), 3or (4.1) of this subsection (a) may be awarded to a prisoner 4who is serving a sentence for an offense described in 5paragraph (2), (2.3), (2.4), (2.5), or (2.6) for credit earned 6on or after January 1, 2018 (the effective date of Public Act 7100-3); provided, the award of the credits under this 8paragraph (4.7) shall not reduce the sentence of the prisoner 9to less than the following amounts:10        (i) 85% of his or her sentence if the prisoner is 11    required to serve 85% of his or her sentence; or 12        (ii) 60% of his or her sentence if the prisoner is 13    required to serve 75% of his or her sentence, except if the 14    prisoner is serving a sentence for gunrunning his or her 15    sentence shall not be reduced to less than 75%.16        (iii) 100% of his or her sentence if the prisoner is 17    required to serve 100% of his or her sentence.18    (5) Whenever the Department is to release any inmate 19earlier than it otherwise would because of a grant of earned 20sentence credit under paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of this 21Section given at any time during the term, the Department 22shall give reasonable notice of the impending release not less 23than 14 days prior to the date of the release to the State's 24Attorney of the county where the prosecution of the inmate 25took place, and if applicable, the State's Attorney of the 26county into which the inmate will be released. The Department   SB2983- 31 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1must also make identification information and a recent photo 2of the inmate being released accessible on the Internet by 3means of a hyperlink labeled "Community Notification of Inmate 4Early Release" on the Department's World Wide Web homepage. 5The identification information shall include the inmate's: 6name, any known alias, date of birth, physical 7characteristics, commitment offense, and county where 8conviction was imposed. The identification information shall 9be placed on the website within 3 days of the inmate's release 10and the information may not be removed until either: 11completion of the first year of mandatory supervised release 12or return of the inmate to custody of the Department.13    (b) Whenever a person is or has been committed under 14several convictions, with separate sentences, the sentences 15shall be construed under Section 5-8-4 in granting and 16forfeiting of sentence credit.17    (c) (1) The Department shall prescribe rules and 18regulations for revoking sentence credit, including revoking 19sentence credit awarded under paragraph (3) of subsection (a) 20of this Section. The Department shall prescribe rules and 21regulations establishing and requiring the use of a sanctions 22matrix for revoking sentence credit. The Department shall 23prescribe rules and regulations for suspending or reducing the 24rate of accumulation of sentence credit for specific rule 25violations, during imprisonment. These rules and regulations 26shall provide that no inmate may be penalized more than one   SB2983- 32 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1year of sentence credit for any one infraction.2    (2) When the Department seeks to revoke, suspend, or 3reduce the rate of accumulation of any sentence credits for an 4alleged infraction of its rules, it shall bring charges 5therefor against the prisoner sought to be so deprived of 6sentence credits before the Prisoner Review Board as provided 7in subparagraph (a)(4) of Section 3-3-2 of this Code, if the 8amount of credit at issue exceeds 30 days, whether from one 9infraction or cumulatively from multiple infractions arising 10out of a single event, or when, during any 12-month period, the 11cumulative amount of credit revoked exceeds 30 days except 12where the infraction is committed or discovered within 60 days 13of scheduled release. In those cases, the Department of 14Corrections may revoke up to 30 days of sentence credit. The 15Board may subsequently approve the revocation of additional 16sentence credit, if the Department seeks to revoke sentence 17credit in excess of 30 days. However, the Board shall not be 18empowered to review the Department's decision with respect to 19the loss of 30 days of sentence credit within any calendar year 20for any prisoner or to increase any penalty beyond the length 21requested by the Department.22    (3) The Director of Corrections or the Director of 23Juvenile Justice, in appropriate cases, may restore sentence 24credits which have been revoked, suspended, or reduced. The 25Department shall prescribe rules and regulations governing the 26restoration of sentence credits. These rules and regulations   SB2983- 33 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1shall provide for the automatic restoration of sentence 2credits following a period in which the prisoner maintains a 3record without a disciplinary violation.4    Nothing contained in this Section shall prohibit the 5Prisoner Review Board from ordering, pursuant to Section 63-3-9(a)(3)(i)(B), that a prisoner serve up to one year of the 7sentence imposed by the court that was not served due to the 8accumulation of sentence credit.9    (d) If a lawsuit is filed by a prisoner in an Illinois or 10federal court against the State, the Department of 11Corrections, or the Prisoner Review Board, or against any of 12their officers or employees, and the court makes a specific 13finding that a pleading, motion, or other paper filed by the 14prisoner is frivolous, the Department of Corrections shall 15conduct a hearing to revoke up to 180 days of sentence credit 16by bringing charges against the prisoner sought to be deprived 17of the sentence credits before the Prisoner Review Board as 18provided in subparagraph (a)(8) of Section 3-3-2 of this Code. 19If the prisoner has not accumulated 180 days of sentence 20credit at the time of the finding, then the Prisoner Review 21Board may revoke all sentence credit accumulated by the 22prisoner.23    For purposes of this subsection (d):24        (1) "Frivolous" means that a pleading, motion, or 25    other filing which purports to be a legal document filed 26    by a prisoner in his or her lawsuit meets any or all of the   SB2983- 34 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1    following criteria:2            (A) it lacks an arguable basis either in law or in 3        fact;4            (B) it is being presented for any improper 5        purpose, such as to harass or to cause unnecessary 6        delay or needless increase in the cost of litigation;7            (C) the claims, defenses, and other legal 8        contentions therein are not warranted by existing law 9        or by a nonfrivolous argument for the extension, 10        modification, or reversal of existing law or the 11        establishment of new law;12            (D) the allegations and other factual contentions 13        do not have evidentiary support or, if specifically so 14        identified, are not likely to have evidentiary support 15        after a reasonable opportunity for further 16        investigation or discovery; or17            (E) the denials of factual contentions are not 18        warranted on the evidence, or if specifically so 19        identified, are not reasonably based on a lack of 20        information or belief.21        (2) "Lawsuit" means a motion pursuant to Section 116-3 22    of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963, a habeas corpus 23    action under Article X of the Code of Civil Procedure or 24    under federal law (28 U.S.C. 2254), a petition for claim 25    under the Court of Claims Act, an action under the federal 26    Civil Rights Act (42 U.S.C. 1983), or a second or   SB2983- 35 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1    subsequent petition for post-conviction relief under 2    Article 122 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 3    whether filed with or without leave of court or a second or 4    subsequent petition for relief from judgment under Section 5    2-1401 of the Code of Civil Procedure.6    (e) Nothing in Public Act 90-592 or 90-593 affects the 7validity of Public Act 89-404.8    (f) Whenever the Department is to release any inmate who 9has been convicted of a violation of an order of protection 10under Section 12-3.4 or 12-30 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or 11the Criminal Code of 2012, earlier than it otherwise would 12because of a grant of sentence credit, the Department, as a 13condition of release, shall require that the person, upon 14release, be placed under electronic surveillance as provided 15in Section 5-8A-7 of this Code. 16(Source: P.A. 102-28, eff. 6-25-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 17102-784, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1100, eff. 1-1-23; 103-51, eff. 181-1-24; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-330, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, 19eff. 7-1-24; 103-822, eff. 1-1-25.) 20    (730 ILCS 5/3-14-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1003-14-1)21    Sec. 3-14-1. Release from the institution. 22    (a) Upon release of a person on parole, mandatory release, 23final discharge, or pardon, the Department shall return all 24property held for him, provide him with suitable clothing and 25procure necessary transportation for him to his designated   SB2983- 36 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1place of residence and employment. It may provide such person 2with a grant of money for travel and expenses which may be paid 3in installments. The amount of the money grant shall be 4determined by the Department.5    (a-1) The Department shall, before a wrongfully imprisoned 6person, as defined in Section 3-1-2 of this Code, is 7discharged from the Department, provide him or her with any 8documents necessary after discharge. 9    (a-2) The Department of Corrections may establish and 10maintain, in any institution it administers, revolving funds 11to be known as "Travel and Allowances Revolving Funds". These 12revolving funds shall be used for advancing travel and expense 13allowances to committed, paroled, and discharged prisoners. 14The moneys paid into such revolving funds shall be from 15appropriations to the Department for Committed, Paroled, and 16Discharged Prisoners.17    (a-3) Prior to Upon release of a person who is eligible to 18vote on parole, mandatory release, final discharge, or pardon, 19the Department shall provide the person with a change of 20address form that informs him or her that his or her voting 21rights have been restored and a voter registration 22application. The Department shall have available voter 23registration application form applications in the languages 24provided by the Illinois State Board of Elections. The form 25that informs the person that his or her rights have been 26restored shall include the following information:  SB2983- 37 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1        (1) All voting rights are restored upon release from 2    the Department's custody.3        (2) A person who is eligible to vote must register in 4    order to be able to vote. 5    The Department of Corrections shall confirm that the 6person received the change of address voter registration 7application form and has been informed that his or her voting 8address is accurate rights have been restored. 9    (a-4) Prior to release of a person on parole, mandatory 10supervised release, final discharge, or pardon, the Department 11shall screen every person for Medicaid eligibility. Officials 12of the correctional institution or facility where the 13committed person is assigned shall assist an eligible person 14to complete a Medicaid application to ensure that the person 15begins receiving benefits as soon as possible after his or her 16release. The application must include the eligible person's 17address associated with his or her residence upon release from 18the facility. If the residence is temporary, the eligible 19person must notify the Department of Human Services of his or 20her change in address upon transition to permanent housing. 21    (a-5) Upon release of a person from its custody to parole, 22upon mandatory supervised release, or upon final discharge, 23the Department shall run a LEADS report and shall notify the 24person of all in-effect protective orders issued against the 25person under Article 112A of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 261963 or under the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986, the   SB2983- 38 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1Civil No Contact Order Act, or the Stalking No Contact Order 2Act, that are identified in the LEADS report. 3    (b) (Blank).4    (c) Except as otherwise provided in this Code, the 5Department shall establish procedures to provide written 6notification of any release of any person who has been 7convicted of a felony to the State's Attorney and sheriff of 8the county from which the offender was committed, and the 9State's Attorney and sheriff of the county into which the 10offender is to be paroled or released. Except as otherwise 11provided in this Code, the Department shall establish 12procedures to provide written notification to the proper law 13enforcement agency for any municipality of any release of any 14person who has been convicted of a felony if the arrest of the 15offender or the commission of the offense took place in the 16municipality, if the offender is to be paroled or released 17into the municipality, or if the offender resided in the 18municipality at the time of the commission of the offense. If a 19person convicted of a felony who is in the custody of the 20Department of Corrections or on parole or mandatory supervised 21release informs the Department that he or she has resided, 22resides, or will reside at an address that is a housing 23facility owned, managed, operated, or leased by a public 24housing agency, the Department must send written notification 25of that information to the public housing agency that owns, 26manages, operates, or leases the housing facility. The written   SB2983- 39 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1notification shall, when possible, be given at least 14 days 2before release of the person from custody, or as soon 3thereafter as possible. The written notification shall be 4provided electronically if the State's Attorney, sheriff, 5proper law enforcement agency, or public housing agency has 6provided the Department with an accurate and up to date email 7address. 8    (c-1) (Blank).9    (c-2) The Department shall establish procedures to provide 10notice to the Illinois State Police of the release or 11discharge of persons convicted of violations of the 12Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act or a 13violation of the Methamphetamine Precursor Control Act. The 14Illinois State Police shall make this information available to 15local, State, or federal law enforcement agencies upon 16request.17    (c-5) If a person on parole or mandatory supervised 18release becomes a resident of a facility licensed or regulated 19by the Department of Public Health, the Illinois Department of 20Public Aid, or the Illinois Department of Human Services, the 21Department of Corrections shall provide copies of the 22following information to the appropriate licensing or 23regulating Department and the licensed or regulated facility 24where the person becomes a resident:25        (1) The mittimus and any pre-sentence investigation 26    reports.  SB2983- 40 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1        (2) The social evaluation prepared pursuant to Section 2    3-8-2.3        (3) Any pre-release evaluation conducted pursuant to 4    subsection (j) of Section 3-6-2.5        (4) Reports of disciplinary infractions and 6    dispositions.7        (5) Any parole plan, including orders issued by the 8    Prisoner Review Board, and any violation reports and 9    dispositions.10        (6) The name and contact information for the assigned 11    parole agent and parole supervisor. 12    This information shall be provided within 3 days of the 13person becoming a resident of the facility. 14    (c-10) If a person on parole or mandatory supervised 15release becomes a resident of a facility licensed or regulated 16by the Department of Public Health, the Illinois Department of 17Public Aid, or the Illinois Department of Human Services, the 18Department of Corrections shall provide written notification 19of such residence to the following:20        (1) The Prisoner Review Board.21        (2) The chief of police and sheriff in the 22    municipality and county in which the licensed facility is 23    located.24    The notification shall be provided within 3 days of the 25person becoming a resident of the facility. 26    (d) Upon the release of a committed person on parole,   SB2983- 41 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1mandatory supervised release, final discharge, or pardon, the 2Department shall provide such person with information 3concerning programs and services of the Illinois Department of 4Public Health to ascertain whether such person has been 5exposed to the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) or any 6identified causative agent of Acquired Immunodeficiency 7Syndrome (AIDS).8    (e) Upon the release of a committed person on parole, 9mandatory supervised release, final discharge, pardon, or who 10has been wrongfully imprisoned, the Department shall verify 11the released person's full name, date of birth, and social 12security number. If verification is made by the Department by 13obtaining a certified copy of the released person's birth 14certificate and the released person's social security card or 15other documents authorized by the Secretary, the Department 16shall provide the birth certificate and social security card 17or other documents authorized by the Secretary to the released 18person. If verification by the Department is done by means 19other than obtaining a certified copy of the released person's 20birth certificate and the released person's social security 21card or other documents authorized by the Secretary, the 22Department shall complete a verification form, prescribed by 23the Secretary of State, and shall provide that verification 24form to the released person.25    (f) Forty-five days prior to the scheduled discharge of a 26person committed to the custody of the Department of   SB2983- 42 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1Corrections, the Department shall give the person:2        (1) who is otherwise uninsured an opportunity to apply 3    for health care coverage including medical assistance 4    under Article V of the Illinois Public Aid Code in 5    accordance with subsection (b) of Section 1-8.5 of the 6    Illinois Public Aid Code, and the Department of 7    Corrections shall provide assistance with completion of 8    the application for health care coverage including medical 9    assistance;10        (2) information about obtaining a standard Illinois 11    Identification Card or a limited-term Illinois 12    Identification Card under Section 4 of the Illinois 13    Identification Card Act if the person has not been issued 14    an Illinois Identification Card under subsection (a-20) of 15    Section 4 of the Illinois Identification Card Act;16        (3) information about voter registration and may 17    distribute information prepared by the State Board of 18    Elections. The Department of Corrections may enter into an 19    interagency contract with the State Board of Elections to 20    participate in the automatic voter registration program 21    and be a designated automatic voter registration agency 22    under Section 1A-16.2 of the Election Code;23        (4) information about job listings upon discharge from 24    the correctional institution or facility;25        (5) information about available housing upon discharge 26    from the correctional institution or facility;  SB2983- 43 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1        (6) a directory of elected State officials and of 2    officials elected in the county and municipality, if any, 3    in which the committed person intends to reside upon 4    discharge from the correctional institution or facility; 5    and6        (7) any other information that the Department of 7    Corrections deems necessary to provide the committed 8    person in order for the committed person to reenter the 9    community and avoid recidivism. 10    (g) Sixty days before the scheduled discharge of a person 11committed to the custody of the Department or upon receipt of 12the person's certified birth certificate and social security 13card as set forth in subsection (d) of Section 3-8-1 of this 14Act, whichever occurs later, the Department shall transmit an 15application for an Identification Card to the Secretary of 16State, in accordance with subsection (a-20) of Section 4 of 17the Illinois Identification Card Act.18    The Department may adopt rules to implement this Section. 19(Source: P.A. 103-345, eff. 1-1-24; 104-11, eff. 6-20-25.) 20    (730 ILCS 5/5-5-5)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1005-5-5)21    Sec. 5-5-5. Loss and restoration of rights. 22    (a) Conviction and disposition shall not entail the loss 23by the defendant of any civil rights, except under this 24Section and Sections 29-6 and 29-10 of The Election Code, as 25now or hereafter amended.  SB2983- 44 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1    (b) A person convicted of a felony shall be ineligible to 2hold an office created by the Constitution of this State until 3the completion of his sentence.4    (b-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person 5convicted of a felony, bribery, perjury, or other infamous 6crime for an offense committed on or after the effective date 7of this amendatory Act of the 103rd General Assembly and 8committed while he or she was serving as a public official in 9this State is ineligible to hold any local public office or any 10office created by the Constitution of this State unless the 11person's conviction is reversed, the person is again restored 12to such rights by the terms of a pardon for the offense, the 13person has received a restoration of rights by the Governor, 14or the person's rights are otherwise restored by law.15    (c) Beginning on January 1, 2028, a person convicted of a 16felony or otherwise under sentence in a correctional 17institution shall have his or her right to vote restored not 18later than 14 days following his or her conviction. A person 19who is serving a sentence in a correctional institution 20starting prior to January 1, 2028 shall have his or her right 21to vote restored not later than January 14, 2028. A person 22sentenced to imprisonment shall lose his right to vote until 23released from imprisonment.24    (d) On completion of sentence of imprisonment or upon 25discharge from probation, conditional discharge or periodic 26imprisonment, or at any time thereafter, all license rights   SB2983- 45 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1and privileges granted under the authority of this State which 2have been revoked or suspended because of conviction of an 3offense shall be restored unless the authority having 4jurisdiction of such license rights finds after investigation 5and hearing that restoration is not in the public interest. 6This paragraph (d) shall not apply to the suspension or 7revocation of a license to operate a motor vehicle under the 8Illinois Vehicle Code.9    (e) Upon a person's discharge from incarceration or 10parole, or upon a person's discharge from probation or at any 11time thereafter, the committing court may enter an order 12certifying that the sentence has been satisfactorily completed 13when the court believes it would assist in the rehabilitation 14of the person and be consistent with the public welfare. Such 15order may be entered upon the motion of the defendant or the 16State or upon the court's own motion.17    (f) Upon entry of the order, the court shall issue to the 18person in whose favor the order has been entered a certificate 19stating that his behavior after conviction has warranted the 20issuance of the order.21    (g) This Section shall not affect the right of a defendant 22to collaterally attack his conviction or to rely on it in bar 23of subsequent proceedings for the same offense.24    (h) No application for any license specified in subsection 25(i) of this Section granted under the authority of this State 26shall be denied by reason of an eligible offender who has   SB2983- 46 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1obtained a certificate of relief from disabilities, as defined 2in Article 5.5 of this Chapter, having been previously 3convicted of one or more criminal offenses, or by reason of a 4finding of lack of "good moral character" when the finding is 5based upon the fact that the applicant has previously been 6convicted of one or more criminal offenses, unless:7        (1) there is a direct relationship between one or more 8    of the previous criminal offenses and the specific license 9    sought; or10        (2) the issuance of the license would involve an 11    unreasonable risk to property or to the safety or welfare 12    of specific individuals or the general public.13    In making such a determination, the licensing agency shall 14consider the following factors:15        (1) the public policy of this State, as expressed in 16    Article 5.5 of this Chapter, to encourage the licensure 17    and employment of persons previously convicted of one or 18    more criminal offenses;19        (2) the specific duties and responsibilities 20    necessarily related to the license being sought;21        (3) the bearing, if any, the criminal offenses or 22    offenses for which the person was previously convicted 23    will have on his or her fitness or ability to perform one 24    or more such duties and responsibilities;25        (4) the time which has elapsed since the occurrence of 26    the criminal offense or offenses;  SB2983- 47 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1        (5) the age of the person at the time of occurrence of 2    the criminal offense or offenses;3        (6) the seriousness of the offense or offenses;4        (7) any information produced by the person or produced 5    on his or her behalf in regard to his or her rehabilitation 6    and good conduct, including a certificate of relief from 7    disabilities issued to the applicant, which certificate 8    shall create a presumption of rehabilitation in regard to 9    the offense or offenses specified in the certificate; and10        (8) the legitimate interest of the licensing agency in 11    protecting property, and the safety and welfare of 12    specific individuals or the general public.13    (i) A certificate of relief from disabilities shall be 14issued only for a license or certification issued under the 15following Acts:16        (1) the Animal Welfare Act; except that a certificate 17    of relief from disabilities may not be granted to provide 18    for the issuance or restoration of a license under the 19    Animal Welfare Act for any person convicted of violating 20    Section 3, 3.01, 3.02, 3.03, 3.03-1, or 4.01 of the Humane 21    Care for Animals Act or Section 26-5 or 48-1 of the 22    Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012;23        (2) the Illinois Athletic Trainers Practice Act;24        (3) the Barber, Cosmetology, Esthetics, Hair Braiding, 25    and Nail Technology Act of 1985;26        (4) the Boiler and Pressure Vessel Repairer Regulation   SB2983- 48 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1    Act;2        (5) the Boxing and Full-contact Martial Arts Act;3        (6) the Illinois Certified Shorthand Reporters Act of 4    1984;5        (7) the Illinois Farm Labor Contractor Certification 6    Act;7        (8) the Registered Interior Designers Act;8        (9) the Illinois Professional Land Surveyor Act of 9    1989;10        (10) the Landscape Architecture Registration Act;11        (11) the Marriage and Family Therapy Licensing Act;12        (12) the Private Employment Agency Act;13        (13) the Professional Counselor and Clinical 14    Professional Counselor Licensing and Practice Act;15        (14) the Real Estate License Act of 2000;16        (15) the Illinois Roofing Industry Licensing Act;17        (16) the Professional Engineering Practice Act of 18    1989;19        (17) the Water Well and Pump Installation Contractor's 20    License Act;21        (18) the Electrologist Licensing Act; 22        (19) the Auction License Act;23        (20) the Illinois Architecture Practice Act of 1989;24        (21) the Dietitian Nutritionist Practice Act;25        (22) the Environmental Health Practitioner Licensing 26    Act;  SB2983- 49 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1        (23) the Funeral Directors and Embalmers Licensing 2    Code;3        (24) (blank);4        (25) the Professional Geologist Licensing Act;5        (26) the Illinois Public Accounting Act; and6        (27) the Structural Engineering Practice Act of 1989.7(Source: P.A. 102-284, eff. 8-6-21; 103-562, eff. 11-17-23.) 8    (730 ILCS 5/5-5-11 new)9    Sec. 5-5-11. Civil actions. 10    (a) The Attorney General may bring a civil action in a 11court of competent jurisdiction for such declaratory or 12injunctive relief as is necessary for a violation of 13subsection (c) of Section 5-5-5.14    (b) Any individual aggrieved by a violation of subsection 15(c) of Section 5-5-5, any entity whose membership includes 16individuals aggrieved by a violation of subsection (c) of 17Section 5-5-5, any entity whose mission would be frustrated by 18a violation of subsection (c) of Section 5-5-5, or any entity 19that would expend resources in order to fulfill its mission as 20a result of a violation of subsection (c) of Section 5-5-5 may 21provide written notice of the violation to the Director of 22Corrections and the chair of the State Board of Elections.23        (1) If the violation is not corrected within 30 days 24    after receipt of a notice under this subsection (b), or 25    within 20 days after receipt of the notice under this   SB2983- 50 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1    subsection (b) if the violation occurred within 120 days 2    before the date of an election, the aggrieved party may 3    bring a civil action in court of competent jurisdiction 4    for declaratory or injunctive relief with respect to the 5    violation.6        (2) If the violation occurred within 30 days before 7    the date of an election, the aggrieved person need not 8    provide notice to Director of Corrections or the chair of 9    the State Board of Elections under this subsection (b) 10    before bringing a civil action under paragraph (1) of this 11    subsection (b).12    (c) This Act is intended to benefit and protect the rights 13of individual voters and to provide a remedy for infringing on 14the rights granted under this Act.15    (d) All requirements of the federal Prison Litigation 16Reform Act, 42 U.S.C. 1997e, including subsection (a), Section 173-8-8 of this Code, and 20 Ill. Adm. Code Part 504, Subpart F, 18shall also apply to this Section. 19    (730 ILCS 5/5-5-12 new)20    Sec. 5-5-12. Attorney's fees. Upon motion, a court shall 21award reasonable attorney's fees and costs, including expert 22witness fees and other litigation expenses, to a plaintiff 23(other than the State of Illinois) in any action brought under 24Section 5-5-11:25        (1) who obtains some or all of his or her requested   SB2983- 51 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1    relief through a judicial judgment in the plaintiff's 2    favor;3        (2) who obtains some or all of their requested relief 4    through any settlement agreement approved by the court; or5        (3) whose pursuit of a nonfrivolous claim was a 6    catalyst for a unilateral change in position by the 7    opposing party relative to the relief sought.8    In awarding reasonable attorney's fees, the court shall 9consider the degree to which the relief obtained relates to 10the relief sought. 11    Section 20. The Re-Entering Citizens Civics Education Act 12is amended by changing Sections 1, 5, 10, 15, 20, 25, and 40 13and by adding Section 45 as follows: 14    (730 ILCS 200/1)15    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 16Reintegration and Civic Empowerment Re-Entering Citizens 17Civics Education Act.18(Source: P.A. 101-441, eff. 1-1-20.) 19    (730 ILCS 200/5)20    Sec. 5. Definitions. In this Act:21    "Co-facilitators" means a committed person at the 22Department of Juvenile Justice who is specifically trained in 23voting rights education, who shall assist in conducting voting   SB2983- 52 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1and civics education workshops for committed persons at the 2Department of Juvenile Justice; or a member of an established 3nonpartisan civic organization who has been trained to conduct 4voting and civics education workshops who are scheduled for 5discharge within 12 months. 6    "Committed person" means a person committed and confined 7to and in the physical custody of the Department of 8Corrections or the Department of Juvenile Justice.9    "Commitment" means a judicially determined placement in 10the physical custody of the Department of Corrections or the 11Department of Juvenile Justice on the basis of conviction or 12delinquency.13    "Correctional institution or facility" means a Department 14of Corrections or Department of Juvenile Justice building or 15part of a Department of Corrections or Department of Juvenile 16Justice building where committed persons are detained in a 17secure manner. 18    "Detainee" means a committed person in the physical 19custody of the Department of Corrections or the Department of 20Juvenile Justice.21    "Director" includes the Directors of the Department of 22Corrections and the Department of Juvenile Justice unless the 23text solely specifies a particular Director.24    "Discharge" means the end of a sentence or the final 25termination of a committed person's physical commitment to and 26confinement in the Department of Corrections. Discharge means   SB2983- 53 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1the end of a sentence or the final termination of a committed 2person's physical commitment to and confinement in the 3Department of Juvenile Justice.4    "Peer educator" means a committed person an incarcerated 5citizen at the Department of Corrections who is specifically 6trained in voting rights education, who shall conduct voting 7and civics education workshops for committed persons at the 8Department of Corrections who are scheduled for discharge 9within 12 months.10    "Program" means the nonpartisan peer education and 11information instruction established by this Act.12    "Program participant" means a committed person enrolled in 13the program or otherwise participating in a program workshop. 14    "Re-entering citizen" means any United States citizen who 15is: 17 years of age or older; in the physical custody of the 16Department of Corrections or Department of Juvenile Justice; 17and scheduled to be re-entering society within 12 months.18(Source: P.A. 101-441, eff. 1-1-20; 102-374, eff. 1-1-22; 19102-558, eff. 8-20-21.) 20    (730 ILCS 200/10)21    Sec. 10. Purpose; program. The purpose of this Act is to 22advance collective liberation, foster community healing, and 23establish individuals as active members of the community. The 24Department of Corrections and the Department of Juvenile 25Justice shall implement provide a nonpartisan peer-led civics   SB2983- 54 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1program. This program, emphasizing that reintegration must be 2a collective effort, is designed to impart civics education to 3committed persons, including those on the verge of re-entering 4society. The overarching goals of the program are to 5facilitate the successful reintegration of committed persons 6into society, champion the principles of democracy, provide 7vital information to eligible voters among the committed 8population, contribute to the reduction of recidivism rates 9within this State, and improve community cohesion, recognizing 10its significance as a social determinant of health throughout 11the correctional institutions of this State to teach civics to 12soon-to-be released citizens who will be re-entering society. 13The goal of the program is to promote the successful 14integration of re-entering citizens, promote democracy, and 15reduce rates of recidivism within this State. For young people 16in particular, the study of civics helps people acquire and 17learn to use the skills, knowledge, and attitudes that will 18prepare them to be engaged citizens throughout their lives. 19This program shall coincide with and enhance existing laws to 20ensure that committed persons and voters re-entering citizens 21understand their civic responsibility and know how to secure 22or, if applicable, regain their right to vote as part of the 23exit process. 24(Source: P.A. 101-441, eff. 1-1-20; 102-374, eff. 1-1-22.) 25    (730 ILCS 200/15)  SB2983- 55 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1    Sec. 15. Curriculum and eligibility. 2    (a) The civics peer education program shall consist of a 3rigorous curriculum, and participants shall be instructed on 4subjects including, but not limited to, voting rights, 5governmental institutions, current affairs, and simulations of 6voter registration, election, and democratic processes. Each 7workshop held at the Department of Corrections shall consist 8of 3 sessions that are 90 minutes each and that do not need to 9be taken consecutively. The workshops held at the Department 10of Juvenile Justice shall consist of 270 minutes of 11instruction each calendar year. The Department of Corrections 12shall conduct one session per quarter in a calendar year at 13each correctional institution. The Department of Corrections 14may increase the number of sessions at the Department's 15discretion, based upon the population's needs at each 16facility. 17    (b) The Department of Corrections and the Department of 18Juvenile Justice must offer committed persons the first 19re-entering citizens scheduled to be discharged within 12 20months with the civics peer education workshop session within 2190 days of commitment and must offer and make available the 22entirety of the civics peer education program to committed 23persons within 12 months of commitment program, and each 24re-entering citizen must enroll in the program one to 12 25months prior to his or her expected date of release. This 26workshop must be included in the standard exit process. The   SB2983- 56 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1Department of Corrections and the Department of Juvenile 2Justice should aim to include this workshop in conjunction 3with other commitment pre-release procedures and movements. 4Delays in a workshop being provided shall not cause delays in 5discharge. Committed persons may not be prevented from 6attending workshops due to staffing shortages, lockdowns, or 7to conflicts with family or legal visits, court dates, medical 8appointments, commissary visits, recreational sessions, 9dining, work, class, or bathing schedules. In case of conflict 10or staffing shortages, committed persons re-entering citizens 11must be given full opportunity to attend a workshop at a later 12time. 13    (c) The civics peer education program and workshops must 14be made available to all committed persons regardless of the 15date they were first committed or the length of their 16sentence. Committed persons shall be allowed to enroll in the 17program multiple times or participate in workshop sessions 18multiple times. If necessary due to limitations on the number 19of persons that can attend an individual workshop, the 20Department of Corrections and the Department of Juvenile 21Justice may prioritize attendance for participants who have 22not completed the civics peer education program but shall not 23otherwise restrict access to the program or workshops on the 24basis of a person's commitment date or length of sentence, 25except as necessary to allow a committed person near the end of 26the committed person's term of commitment to complete the   SB2983- 57 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1program before the committed person's release from commitment. 2(Source: P.A. 101-441, eff. 1-1-20; 102-374, eff. 1-1-22.) 3    (730 ILCS 200/20)4    Sec. 20. Peer educator training. The civics peer 5education program shall be taught by peer educators who are 6persons citizens incarcerated in Department of Corrections 7facilities and specially trained by experienced peer educators 8and established nonpartisan civic organizations. Established 9nonpartisan civic organizations may be assisted by area 10political science or civics educators at colleges, 11universities, and high schools and by nonpartisan 12organizations providing re-entry services. The nonpartisan 13civic organizations shall provide adequate training to peer 14educators on matters including, but not limited to, voting 15rights, governmental institutions, current affairs, and 16simulations of voter registration, election, and democratic 17processes, and shall provide periodic updates to program 18content and to peer educators. 19(Source: P.A. 101-441, eff. 1-1-20; 102-374, eff. 1-1-22.) 20    (730 ILCS 200/25)21    Sec. 25. Voter and civic education program; content. 22    (a) Program content shall provide the following:23        (1) nonpartisan information on voting history and 24    voting procedures;  SB2983- 58 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1        (2) nonpartisan definitions of local, State, and 2    federal governmental institutions and offices; and3        (3) examples and simulations of registration and 4    voting processes, and access to voter registration and 5    voting processes for those individuals who are eligible to 6    vote.7    (b) Established nonpartisan civic organizations shall 8provide periodic updates to program content and, if 9applicable, peer educators and co-facilitators. Updates shall 10reflect major relevant changes to election laws and processes 11in Illinois.12    (c) Program content shall be delivered in the following 13manners:14        (1) verbally via peer educators and co-facilitators;15        (2) broadcasts via Department of Corrections and 16    Department of Juvenile Justice internal television 17    channels; or18        (3) printed information packets.19    (d) Peer educators and co-facilitators shall disseminate 20printed information for voting in the program participant's 21releasee's county, including, but not limited to, election 22authorities' addresses, all applicable Internet websites, and 23public contact information for all election authorities. This 24information shall be compiled into a civics handbook. The 25handbook shall also include key information condensed into a 26pocket information card.  SB2983- 59 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1    (e) The This information in subsection (d) shall also be 2compiled electronically and posted on the Department of 3Corrections' and the Department of Juvenile Justice's websites 4website along with the Department of Corrections' Community 5Support Advisory Councils' Councils websites.6    (e-1) The Department of Corrections and the Department of 7Juvenile Justice shall collaborate with local election 8authorities to make voter registration materials available to 9every committed person eligible to register to vote not more 10than 90 days nor less than 45 days before a municipal primary, 11general primary, general election, consolidated primary, or 12consolidated election, and upon request by the committed 13person. At the start of early voting for any election, the 14Department of Corrections and the Department of Juvenile 15Justice shall collaborate with local election authorities to 16make the registration materials described in this Section 17available, along with all materials related to obtaining and 18submitting a ballot. Mail-in ballots shall be considered and 19treated in the same manner as legal mail and must be made 20available to the voter within 7 business days of delivery to 21the correctional institution. Mail-in ballots must be 22delivered to a mail carrier within 2 business days of a 23committed person requesting it be mailed unless the relevant 24election authority coordinates with the correctional facility 25for an alternative method of delivery. 26    (f) Department Directors shall ensure that the wardens or   SB2983- 60 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1superintendents of all correctional institutions and 2facilities visibly post this information on all common areas 3of their respective institutions, and shall broadcast the same 4via in-house institutional information television channels. 5Directors shall ensure that updated information is distributed 6in a timely, visible, and accessible manner.7    (g) The Director of Corrections shall order, in a clearly 8visible area of each parole office within this State, the 9posting of a notice stipulating voter eligibility and that 10contains the current Internet website address and voter 11registration information provided by State Board of Elections 12regarding voting rights for citizens released from the 13physical custody of the Department of Corrections and the 14Department of Juvenile Justice.15    (h) All program content and materials shall be distributed 16annually to the Community Support Advisory Councils of the 17Department of Corrections for use in re-entry programs across 18this State. 19(Source: P.A. 101-441, eff. 1-1-20; 102-374, eff. 1-1-22; 20revised 6-23-25.) 21    (730 ILCS 200/40)22    Sec. 40. Voter and civic education program monitoring and 23enforcement. 24    (a) The Director of Corrections and the Director of 25Juvenile Justice shall ensure that wardens or superintendents,   SB2983- 61 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1program, educational, and security and movement staff permit 2these workshops to take place, and that program participants 3re-entering citizens are escorted to workshops in a consistent 4and timely manner.5    (b) Compliance with this Act shall be monitored by a 6report published annually by the Department of Corrections and 7the Department of Juvenile Justice and containing data, which 8shall include the following: including 9        (1) numbers of committed persons re-entering citizens 10    who enrolled in the program; , 11        (2) numbers of committed persons re-entering citizens 12    who completed the program; , 13        (3) numbers of total committed persons; 14        (4) numbers of peer educators; 15        (5) and total numbers of committed persons who exited 16    (including the number of those who were and the number of 17    those under supervision); 18        (6) numbers of mail-in ballots requested by committed 19    persons;20        (7) numbers of mail-in ballots delivered to mail 21    carriers from correctional facilities; and22        (8) numbers of voter registration forms submitted to 23    election authorities by committed persons by mail or 24    otherwise.25    For purposes of this subsection (b), election authorities 26shall coordinate with the Department of Corrections and   SB2983- 62 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1Department of Juvenile Justice to compile the information 2listed under paragraphs (6) through (8) of this subsection 3individuals discharged. 4    Data shall be disaggregated by institution, discharge, or 5residence address of citizen, and other factors. 6(Source: P.A. 101-441, eff. 1-1-20.) 7    (730 ILCS 200/45 new)8    Sec. 45. Peer educator pay and stipends. The Department of 9Corrections shall create and implement paid structures in line 10with other states' rates for incarcerated teachers, including, 11but not limited to, professors. 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 131, 2028.  SB2983- 63 -LRB104 18938 SPS 32383 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    5 ILCS 100/5-45.71 new4    10 ILCS 5/1-26 new5    10 ILCS 5/1-27 new6    10 ILCS 5/1-28 new7    10 ILCS 5/1-29 new8    10 ILCS 5/3-5from Ch. 46, par. 3-59    10 ILCS 5/19-2.310    10 ILCS 5/19-2.511    730 ILCS 5/3-6-312    730 ILCS 5/3-14-1from Ch. 38, par. 1003-14-113    730 ILCS 5/5-5-5from Ch. 38, par. 1005-5-514    730 ILCS 5/5-5-11 new15    730 ILCS 5/5-5-12 new16    730 ILCS 200/117    730 ILCS 200/518    730 ILCS 200/1019    730 ILCS 200/1520    730 ILCS 200/2021    730 ILCS 200/2522    730 ILCS 200/4023    730 ILCS 200/45 new